Florida, session 2026, SB1246.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 29 30 Section 1.âSection 1009.8962, Florida Statutes, is amended 31 to read: 32 1009.8962âLinking Industry to Nursing Education (LINE) 33 Fund.â 34 (1)âThis section shall be known and may be cited as the 35 âLinking Industry to Nursing Education (LINE) Fund Act.â 36 (2)âRecognizing that the state has a persistent and growing 37 nursing shortage, it is the intent of the Legislature to address 38 this critical workforce need by incentivizing collaboration 39 between nursing education programs and health care partners that 40 contribute monetary or nonmonetary contributions through the 41 establishment of the LINE Fund. This fund is intended to meet 42 local, regional, and state workforce demand by recruiting 43 faculty and clinical preceptors, increasing the capacity of 44 high-quality nursing education programs, and increasing the 45 number of nursing education program graduates who are prepared 46 and licensed to enter the workforce. 47 (3)âAs used in this section, the term: 48 (a)ââHealth care partnerâ means a health care provider as 49 defined in s. 768.38(2) which is licensed to operate in this 50 state. 51 (b)ââInstitutionâ means a school district career center 52 under s. 1001.44; a charter technical career center under s. 53 1002.34; a Florida College System institution; a state 54 university; an independent nonprofit college or university 55 located and chartered in this state and accredited by an agency 56 or association that is recognized by the database created and 57 maintained by the United States Department of Education to grant 58 baccalaureate degrees; or an independent school, college, or 59 university with an accredited program as defined in s. 464.003 60 which is located in this state and licensed by the Commission 61 for Independent Education pursuant to s. 1005.31, or an 62 institution authorized under s. 1009.521, which has a nursing 63 education program that meets or exceeds the following: 64 1.âFor a certified nursing assistant program, a completion 65 rate of at least 70 percent for the prior year. 66 2.âFor a licensed practical nurse, associate of science in 67 nursing, and bachelor of science in nursing program, a first 68 time passage rate on the National Council of State Boards of 69 Nursing Licensing Examination of at least 75 percent for the 70 prior year based on a minimum of 10 testing participants. 71 (c)ââStudentâ means a person who is a resident for tuition 72 purposes pursuant to s. 1009.21 and enrolled in a nursing 73 education program at an institution. 74 (4)âThe LINE Fund shall be administered by the Board of 75 Governors for state universities and the Department of Education 76 for all other institutions. 77 (5)âSubject to available funds, for every monetary or 78 nonmonetary contribution dollar contributed to an institution by 79 a health care partner or other person or entity, the fund shall 80 provide a dollar-to-dollar match to the participating 81 institution to implement the activities outlined in the 82 institutionâs approved proposal. Monetary contributions from 83 health care partners shall receive priority when awarding 84 matching funds to institutions. 85 (6)(a)âFunds may be used for student scholarships;, 86 recruitment of additional faculty and preceptors; increasing 87 program enrollment, program completion, and licensure 88 examination passage rates;, equipment;, and simulation centers; 89 and internships to advance high-quality nursing education 90 programs throughout the state. 91 (b)âFunds may not be used for the construction of new 92 buildings, but may be used to expand, retrofit, or upgrade 93 existing facilities if the proposal will result in increased 94 program enrollments or improved or modernized educational or 95 simulation space for an institutionâs nursing education program 96 students. 97 (7)(a)âTo participate, an institutionâs president, chief 98 administrative officer, or designee institution must submit a 99 timely and completed proposal to the Board of Governors or 100 Department of Education, in a format prescribed by the Board of 101 Governors or Department of Education, as applicable. 102 (b)âThe proposal must identify a health care partner 103 located and licensed to operate in the state whose monetary 104 contributions will be matched by the fund on a dollar-to-dollar 105 basis. 106 (c)âAllowable nonmonetary contributions are limited to the 107 following: 108 1.âThe value of the donated use of health care partner 109 employees as nursing education program instructors or 110 preceptors. 111 2.âThe value of the donated use of a health care partnerâs 112 space or equipment by a nursing education program. 113 3.âThe value of donated educational or simulation 114 equipment. 115 4.âOther similar quantifiable donated goods and services 116 deemed by the Board of Governors or Department of Education, as 117 applicable, to be good faith contributions that support the 118 goals of the LINE Fund. 119 (d)âTo accept nonmonetary contributions as health care 120 matching funds, the applicant and Board of Governors or 121 Department of Education, as applicable, must quantify the fair 122 market value of the contribution in dollars and certify that the 123 proposed contribution directly supports the goals of the LINE 124 Fund outlined in subsection (2). 125 (e)âA proposal may not be comprised solely of nonmonetary 126 contributions. 127 (8)âThe Board of Governors or Department of Education, as 128 applicable, must review and evaluate each completed and timely 129 submitted proposal according to the following minimum criteria, 130 where applicable: 131 (a)âWhether monetary and nonmonetary contributions funds 132 committed by the health care partner will contribute to an 133 eligible purpose. 134 (b)âHow the institution plans to use the funds or 135 nonmonetary contribution, including how such funds or 136 nonmonetary contribution will be utilized to increase student 137 enrollment and program completion. 138 (c)âHow the health care partner will onboard and retain 139 graduates or otherwise improve the likelihood that graduates 140 will successfully join the state or local workforce. 141 (d)âHow the funds or nonmonetary contribution will be used 142 to expand the institutionâs nursing education programs to meet 143 local, regional, or state workforce demands. If applicable, this 144 shall include advanced education nursing programs and how the 145 funds or nonmonetary contribution will increase the number of 146 faculty and clinical preceptors and planned efforts to utilize 147 the clinical placement process established in s. 14.36. 148 (9)(a)âEach institution with an approved proposal shall 149 notify the Board of Governors or Department of Education, as 150 applicable, upon receipt of the health care partner provided 151 funds or nonmonetary contribution identified in the proposal. 152 The Board of Governors or Department of Education, as 153 applicable, shall release grant funds, on a dollar-for-dollar 154 basis, up to the amount of funds or the fair market value of the 155 nonmonetary contribution received by the institution, including 156 notifications made on a rolling or periodic basis. 157 (b)âIf deemed to meet the long-term goals of the LINE Fund, 158 the Board of Governors or Department of Education, as 159 applicable, may, but are not required to, award funds for an 160 approved proposal for up to 2 academic years immediately 161 following the academic year within which the initial approval is 162 granted. If the Board of Governors or Department of Education, 163 as applicable, approves a multiyear award to an institution, it 164 must notify the recipient that the award amount in subsequent 165 years is subject to a LINE Fund appropriation and the continued 166 notification of the health care partnerâs contribution to match 167 the multiyear award of state funds. 168 (c)(b)âAnnually, by February 1, each institution awarded 169 grant funds in the previous fiscal year shall submit a report to 170 the Board of Governors or Department of Education, as 171 applicable, that demonstrates the expansion as outlined in the 172 proposal and the use of funds. At minimum, the report must 173 include, by program level, the number of additional nursing 174 education students enrolled; if scholarships were awarded using 175 grant funds, the number of students who received scholarships 176 and the average award amount; and the outcomes of students as 177 reported by the Office of Reimagining Education and Career Help 178 pursuant to s. 14.36(3)(l). 179 (10)âThe Board of Governors shall adopt regulations and the 180 State Board of Education shall adopt rules to administer the 181 fund, establish dates for the submission and review of 182 proposals, award funds, and other regulations and rules 183 necessary to implement this section. 184 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.